Massachusetts, session 194th, H3309.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary, in any decision to lease,
sell or otherwise dispose of the former probate court space in the Middlesex South registry of
deeds building, the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance shall consider
and prioritize the needs of the executive office of the trial court for building space in the city of
Cambridge. If the executive office of the trial court demonstrates to the commissioner a need for
the use of the building space or any portion thereof, the commissioner shall sell or lease such
space to the executive office.
of 1